Alabama, session 2026rs, SB318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-65.1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-65.1
(a) A person commits the crime of sexual torture if he
or she does any of the following:
(1) Penetrates the vagina, penile opening, anus, or
mouth of another person with an inanimate object, by forcible
compulsion, with the intent to sexually torture, sexually
abuse, or to gratify the sexual desire of either party.
(2) Penetrates the vagina, penile opening, anus, or
mouth of a person who is incapable of consent by reason of
being incapacitated, with an inanimate object, with the intent
to sexually torture, sexually abuse, or to gratify the sexual
desire of either party.
(3) Penetrates the vagina, penile opening, anus, or
mouth of a person who is less than 12 years old of age, with
an inanimate object, by a person who is 16 years old of age or
older with the intent to sexually torture, sexually abuse, or
to gratify the sexual desire of either party.
(4) By inflicting physical injury, including, but not
limited to, burning, crushing, wounding, mutilating, or
Page 1

limited to, burning, crushing, wounding, mutilating, or
SB318 Enrolled
assaulting the sex organs or intimate parts of another person,
with the intent to sexually torture, sexually abuse, or to
gratify the sexual desire of either party.
(b) The crime of sexual torture is a Class A felony."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB318 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB318
Senate 01-Apr-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 09-Apr-26




By: Senator Coleman
Page 3